North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54. Cooperative Organizations.
Article 14G. Loans.

§ 54-109.65.
Purposes, terms and interest rate.

A credit union may loan to its members for such purpose and upon such security and terms as the board of directors prescribes at rates of interest not exceeding eighteen percent (18%) annual percentage rate, unless a greater rate not to exceed the annual percentage rate permitted to be charged by federally chartered credit unions, is otherwise approved by the Credit Union Commission. Such action by the Commission will be uniform and apply to all credit unions.

The term “interest,” as used in this section, shall not be deemed to include charges made by a credit union for appraisals of real or personal property; attorneys’ fees for searching title to real property, preparing notes, deeds of trust, mortgages and closing loans; and recording fees. Rate of interest and terms of repayment shall appear on each note but the corporation may, for the purpose of making loans, discount and negotiate promissory notes and deduct in advance, from the proceeds of such loan, interest at a rate not to exceed the rate herein fixed, which shall be the legal rate for corporations organized under this Article, and such deductions shall be made upon the amount of the loan from the date thereof until the maturity of the final installment, notwithstanding that the principal amount of such loan is required to be repaid in such installments.

History.

1915, c. 115, ss. 19, 20; 1917, c. 232, s. 4; C.S., ss. 5220, 5221; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1955, c. 1135, s. 2; 1957, c. 989, s. 2; 1961, c. 1187, s. 1; 1965, c. 956, ss. 1, 12, 13; 1969, c. 69, s. 9; 1973, c. 199, ss. 5, 6; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1983, c. 568, s. 4.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Loans Need Not Be Repaid in Installments. —

See opinion of the Attorney General to Mr. W.V. Didawick, Administrator of Credit Unions, Department of Agriculture, 40 N.C.A.G. 49 (1969), issued under former G.S. 54-88.

§ 54-109.66.
Application.

Every application for a loan shall be made in writing upon a form, which the board of directors prescribe. The application shall state the purpose for which the loan is desired, and the security, if any, offered. Each loan shall be evidenced by a written document.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.67.
Loan limit.

No loan shall be made to any member in an aggregate amount in excess of ten percent (10%) of the credit union’s unimpaired capital and surplus. In accordance with the bylaws and subject to such rules and regulations as the Administrator may prescribe, the board of directors shall determine and set the maximum unsecured loan limits subject to the limitation contained in the preceding sentence.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 19; 1917, c. 232, s. 4; C.S., s. 5220; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1955, c. 1135, s. 2; 1961, c. 1187, s. 1; 1965, c. 956, ss. 1, 12, 13; 1969, c. 69, s. 9; 1973, c. 199, s. 5; 1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1983, c. 568, s. 5.

§ 54-109.68.
Security.

In addition to generally accepted types of security, the endorsement of a note by a surety, comaker or guarantor, or assignment of shares, in a manner consistent with the laws of this State, shall be deemed security within the meaning of Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter. The adequacy of any security shall be determined by the board of directors subject to Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter and the bylaws.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.69.
Installments.

A member may receive a loan in installments, or in one sum, and may pay the whole or any part of his loan on any day on which the office of the credit union is open for business.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.70.
Line of credit.

A line of credit and advances may be granted to each member within guidelines established by the board of directors. Where a line of credit has been approved, no additional loan applications are required as long as the aggregate obligation does not exceed the limit of such line of credit.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.71.
Other loan programs.

A credit union may participate in loans to credit union members jointly with other credit unions, corporations, or financial organizations.

A credit union may participate in guaranteed loan programs of the federal and State government.

A credit union may purchase the conditional sales contracts, notes and similar instruments of its members.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§§ 54-109.72 through 54-109.74.

Reserved for future codification purposes.